Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

258.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

258.015

,

258.035

,

258.055

,

258.065

, or

258.085

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100). Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

The owner of any dog, cat, or ferret which bites a human being shall be liable to pay all damages for personal injuries resulting from the bite of the dog, cat, or ferret.

Any person violating or failing or refusing to comply with KRS

258.095

to

258.365

, except KRS 258.235(5)(a), shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than five (5) nor more than sixty (60) days, or both.

Any person violating KRS 258.235(5)(a) shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days, or both.

All fines collected under subsection (3) of this section shall after costs and commissions have been deducted, be paid to the department to be credited to the animal control and care fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, §§ 11 and 40; 1958, ch. 126, § 34; 1998, ch. 440, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 24, effective July 13, 2004.

258.991.
Penalties.

Any person violating KRS 258.500(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (11), or (12) shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days, or both. No person shall be charged with a violation of KRS 258.500(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (11), or (12) if the requirements of KRS 258.500(7) are not met.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 118, § 5; 1998, ch. 163, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 94, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 48, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.